Alaska, session 34, HB169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 06 * Section 1. AS 29.45.030(e) is amended to read: 07 (e) The real property owned and occupied as the primary residence and 08 permanent place of abode by a resident who is (1) 65 years of age or older; (2) a 09 disabled veteran; or (3) at least 60 years of age and the widow or widower of a person 10 who qualified for an exemption under (1) or (2) of this subsection is exempt from 11 taxation on the first $250,000 [$150,000] of the assessed value of the real property. A 12 municipality may by ordinance approved by the voters grant the exemption under this 13 subsection to the widow or widower under 60 years of age of a person who qualified 14 for an exemption under (2) of this subsection or to a resident who is the widow or 01 widower of a person who dies from a service-connected cause sustained while serving 02 as a member of the United States armed forces or as a member of the National Guard. 03 A municipality may, in case of hardship, provide for exemption beyond the first 04 $250,000 [$150,000] of assessed value in accordance with regulations of the 05 department. Only one exemption may be granted for the same property, and, if two or 06 more persons are eligible for an exemption for the same property, the parties shall 07 decide between or among themselves who is to receive the benefit of the exemption. 08 Real property may not be exempted under this subsection if the assessor determines, 09 after notice and hearing to the parties, that the property was conveyed to the applicant 10 primarily for the purpose of obtaining the exemption. The determination of the 11 assessor may be appealed under AS 44.62.560 - 44.62.570. A municipality shall 12 determine the eligibility requirements and application procedure for an optional 13 exemption provided under this subsection. In this subsection, "widow or widower" 14 means a person whose spouse has died and who has not remarried. 15 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.